Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-643
Counterfeit airbags; prohibited acts.

A person violates the Counterfeit Airbag Prevention Act if the person does any of the following:

(1) Knowingly and intentionally manufactures, imports, installs, reinstalls, distributes, sells, or offers for sale any device intended to replace a supplemental restraint system component in any motor vehicle if the device is a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component or a nonfunctional airbag or does not meet federal safety requirements as provided in 49 C.F.R. 571.208, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2019;

(2) Knowingly and intentionally sells, installs, or reinstalls a device that causes a motor vehicle's diagnostic system to fail to warn when the motor vehicle is equipped with a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component or a nonfunctional airbag or when no airbag is installed;

(3) Knowingly and intentionally represents to another person that a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component or nonfunctional airbag installed in a motor vehicle is not a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component or a nonfunctional airbag; or

(4) Causes another person to violate this section or assists another person in violating this section.

Laws 2019, LB7, § 4.